Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
MEETINGS AND ACTION OF THE DIRECTORS

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

ontractually Binding

C

olorado Entities", see 28 Colo. Law. 33 (Dec. 1999).

7-108-201. Meetings.

The board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state and may hold the meetings by means of remote communication without designating a place.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the board of directors may permit any director to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may hear each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 782, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 169, § 18, effective April 19.

7-108-202. Action without meeting.

Unless the bylaws require that the action be taken at a meeting, any action required or permitted by articles 101 to 117 of this title to be taken at a board of directors' meeting may be taken without a meeting if all members of the board consent to such action in writing.

Action is taken under this section at the time the last director signs a writing describing the action taken, unless, before such time, any director has revoked the director's consent by a writing signed by the director and received by the secretary or any other person authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors to receive such a revocation.

Action under this section is effective at the time it is taken as provided by subsection (2) of this section, unless the directors establish a different effective date.

Action taken pursuant to this section has the same effect as action taken at a meeting of directors and may be described as such in any document.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 782, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 1498, § 256, effective July 1.

7-108-203. Notice of meeting.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, regular meetings of the board of directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place, if any place is designated, or purpose of the meeting.

Unless the bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special meetings of the board of directors must be preceded by at least two days' notice of the date, time, and place, if any, or access by remote communication of the meeting. The notice need not describe the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the bylaws.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 782, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 169, § 19, effective April 19.

7-108-204. Waiver of notice.

A director may waive any notice of a meeting before or after the time and date of the meeting stated in the notice. Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, the waiver shall be in writing and signed by the director entitled to the notice. Such waiver shall be delivered to the corporation for filing with the corporate records, but such delivery and filing shall not be conditions of the effectiveness of the waiver.

A director's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director of the meeting unless:

At the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the director's later arrival, the director objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting because of lack of notice or defective notice and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting; or

If special notice was required of a particular purpose pursuant to section 7-108-203 (2), the director objects to transacting business with respect to the purpose for which such special notice was required and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting with respect to such purpose.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 782, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2004:

IP(2) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1498, § 257, effective July 1.

7-108-205. Quorum and voting.

Unless a greater number is required by the bylaws, a quorum of a board of directors consists of:

A majority of the number of directors fixed if the corporation has a fixed board size; or

A majority of the number of directors fixed or, if no number is fixed, of the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if a range for the size of the board is established pursuant to section 7-108-103 (2).

The bylaws may authorize a quorum of a board of directors to consist of:

No fewer than a majority of the number of directors fixed if the corporation has a fixed board size; or

No fewer than a majority of the number of directors fixed or, if no number is fixed, of the number in office immediately before the meeting begins, if a range for the size of the board is established pursuant to section 7-108-103 (2).

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board of directors unless the vote of a greater number of directors is required by articles 101 to 117 of this title or the bylaws.

A director who is present at a meeting of the board of directors when corporate action is taken is deemed to have assented to all action taken at the meeting unless:

The director objects at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly upon the director's arrival, to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to any action taken at the meeting;

The director contemporaneously requests that the director's dissent or abstention as to any specific action taken be entered in the minutes of the meeting; or

The director causes notice of the director's dissent or abstention as to any specific action to be received by the presiding officer of the meeting before adjournment of the meeting or by the corporation promptly after adjournment of the meeting.

The right of dissent or abstention pursuant to subsection (4) of this section as to a specific action is not available to a director who votes in favor of the action taken.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 783, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1318, § 22, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(4) amended, p. 1498, § 258, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(4)(c) amended, (HB 21-1124), ch. 41, p. 169, § 20, effective April 19.

7-108-206. Committees.

Except as otherwise provided in the bylaws and subject to the provisions of section 7-109-106, the board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint one or more members of the board of directors to serve on them.

The creation of a committee and appointment of members to it shall be approved by the greater of a majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken or the number of directors required by the bylaws to take action under section 7-108-205.

Sections 7-108-201 to 7-108-205, which govern meetings, action without meeting, notice, waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board of directors, apply to committees and their members as well.

To the extent stated in the bylaws or by the board of directors, each committee shall have the authority of the board of directors under section 7-108-101; except that a committee shall not:

Authorize distributions;

Approve or propose to shareholders action that articles 101 to 117 of this title require to be approved by shareholders;

Fill vacancies on the board of directors or on any of its committees;

Amend articles of incorporation pursuant to section 7-110-102;

Adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws;

Approve a plan of conversion or plan of merger not requiring shareholder approval;

Authorize or approve reacquisition of shares, except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors; or

Authorize or approve the issuance or sale of shares, or a contract for the sale of shares, or determine the designation and relative rights, preferences, and limitations of a class or series of shares; except that the board of directors may authorize a committee or an officer to do so within limits specifically prescribed by the board of directors.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in section 7-108-401.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 784, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

IP(4) amended, p. 1318, § 23, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

IP(4) amended, p. 2320, § 243, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2007:

(4)(f) amended, p. 245, § 42, effective May 29.